District of Columbia statutes.
7-1102

Compact administrator authorized.

Pursuant to this Compact, the Director of the Department of Mental Health shall be the Compact Administrator and, acting jointly with like officers of party states, shall have power to promulgate rules and regulations to carry out more effectively the terms of the Compact. The Compact Administrator is hereby authorized, empowered, and directed to cooperate with all departments, agencies, and officers of and in the government of the District of Columbia in facilitating the proper administration of the Compact or of any supplementary agreement or agreements entered into by the District thereunder.

Apr. 26, 1972, 86 Stat. 130, Pub. L. 92-280, § 3
Dec. 18, 2001, D.C. Law 14-56, § 116(e), 48 DCR 7674

History

1981 Ed., § 6-1802.
1973 Ed., § 6-1602.

Prior Codifications

D.C. Law 14-56, in subsec. (e), substituted “the Director of the Department of Mental Health shall be the Compact Administrator and,” for “the Mayor of the District of Columbia is hereby authorized and empowered to designate an officer who shall be the Compact Administrator and who,”.

Effect of Amendments

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 16(e) of Department of Mental Health Establishment Temporary Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Law 14-51, October 30, 2001, law notification 48 DCR 10807).

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 16(e) of Department of Mental Health Establishment Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-55, May 2, 2001, 48 DCR 4390).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 16(e) of Department of Mental Health Establishment Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-101, July 23, 2001, 48 DCR 7123).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 116(e) of Mental Health Service Delivery Reform Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-144, October 23, 2001, 48 DCR 9947).

Emergency Legislation

The “Compact,” referred to throughout the section, is set forth in § 7-1101.

References in Text

Designation of Compact Administrator: The Director, Department of Human Resources, was designated Compact Administrator for the District of Columbia by Commissioner’s Order No. 72-241A, dated September 20, 1972. The Department of Human Resources was replaced by the Department of Human Services by Reorganization Plan No. 2 of 1979, dated February 21, 1980.

Editor's Notes

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to the District of Columbia Council and to a Commissioner of the District of Columbia. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.

Change in Government